Montana, session 2025, HB841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Article VIII, section 16, of The Constitution of the State of Montana is amended to read:
"Section 16. Limitation on sales tax or use tax rates. The rate of a general statewide sales tax or
use tax may not exceed 4%. Sales tax or use tax revenue, less administrative costs, must be used solely to
reduce property taxes that fund public schools and the Montana university system unless appropriated for other
purposes by a vote of three-fourths of the members of each house of the legislature."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Two-thirds vote required. Because [section 1] is a legislative proposal
to amend the constitution, Article XIV, section 8, of the Montana constitution requires an affirmative roll call vote
of two-thirds of all the members of the legislature, whether one or more bodies, for passage.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. If approved by the electorate, [this act] is effective July 1,
2027.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Submission to electorate. [This act] shall be submitted to the qualified
electors of Montana at the general election to be held in November 2026 by printing on the ballot the full title of
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 841

2026
69th Legislature 2025 HB 841.1
[this act] and the following:
☐ YES on Constitutional Amendment ____.
☐ NO on Constitutional Amendment ____.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 841